Wyoming statutes. Title 37 Public Utilities
Article 2. Regulation of Competitive and Noncompetitive Markets

§ 37-15-201.
Regulation of local exchange services; certificates of public convenience and necessity; concurrent certificates.

Except for those telecommunications companies that as of July 1, 2015, have a valid certificate of public convenience and necessity previously issued by the commission to provide local exchange services in the state, all telecommunications companies seeking to offer and provide local exchange service shall obtain a certificate of public convenience and necessity from the commission prior to providing that service in this state.

The commission shall grant a certificate or certificates of public convenience and necessity to provide local exchange service if it finds, after notice and opportunity for hearing, that the applicant possesses sufficient technical, financial and managerial resources to provide safe, adequate and reliable local exchange services within the identified geographic area.

through (h) Repealed by Laws 2007, ch. 142, § 2.

History.

Laws 1995, ch. 181, § 1; W.S. 1977, § 37-14-201; 2007, ch. 142, §§ 1, 2; 2015 ch. 96, § 1, effective July 1, 2015.

The 2007 amendment,

effective July 1, 2007, substituted “July 1, 2007” for “January 1, 1995” in (a); in (b), deleted “concurrent” preceding “certificates”, and “in the service territory of a local exchange company with more than thirty thousand (30,00) access lines in the state” preceding “if it finds”; and repealed former (c) through (h), which related to local exchange telecommunications companies in existence prior to January 1, 1995, with thirty thousand (30,000) or fewer access lines.

The 2015 amendment,

effective July 1, 2015, in (a), substituted “July 1, 2015” for “July 1, 2007.”

Preemption. —

The Federal Communication Commission has preempted subsection (c) pursuant to the provisions of § 253(b) of the Federal Telecommunications Act of 1996, 47 U.S.C.S. § 253(b).RT Communs., Inc. v. PSC, 2003 WY 145, 79 P.3d 36,

2003 Wyo. LEXIS 175

(Wyo. 2003).

Proper application of subsection (b). —

Wyoming Public Service Commission properly applied subsection (b) in granting a telecommunications company's application for a concurrent certificate of public convenience and necessity to provide local telecommunications exchange services; the legislature intended this section to apply where a company requests that it be allowed to provide additional concurrent services with the current local exchange carriers on those lines that already exist in the area. RT Communs., Inc. v. PSC, 2003 WY 145, 79 P.3d 36,

2003 Wyo. LEXIS 175

(Wyo. 2003).

Sufficient technical, financial and managerial resources. —

A telecommunications company presented adequate evidence that it possessed sufficient managerial, financial, and technical resources to support the concurrent certificate granted by the Wyoming Public Service Commission where: (1) it provided the names, background, and experience in the telecommunications industry of its president, vice-president, and other directors; (2) its prefiled testimony also disclosed that the company's network was managed on a 24 hour/seven-days-a-week basis through two levels of engineers and other networking means; (3) it showed its financial capabilities through submission of numerous financial documentation indicating sufficient equity and profitability; and (4) it demonstrated its knowledge of technical offerings and services required to provide telecommunications services and the capabilities of its employees to provide and monitor such services. RT Communs., Inc. v. PSC, 2003 WY 145, 79 P.3d 36,

2003 Wyo. LEXIS 175

(Wyo. 2003).

§ 37-15-202.
Determination of competitive services.

Upon petition by any telecommunications company or pursuant to the commission’s own motion, the commission may, after notice and opportunity for hearing, find and conclude that a telecommunications service is subject to competition. Any service found to be effectively competitive pursuant to this section shall not be subject to regulation by the commission. The commission shall consider only the following factors in determining whether a telecommunications service is subject to effective competition:

The extent to which telecommunications services are available from alternative providers including, but not limited to, wireless providers, satellite providers, cable providers offering voice services, voice over internet protocol or any other providers utilizing telephone numbers to provide voice services in the relevant market;

The extent to which telecommunications services of alternative providers are functionally equivalent, for equivalent service or in combination with other services, and may be substituted at reasonably comparable prices, terms and conditions;

Existing economic, regulatory or technological barriers to entry.

Upon the commission’s own motion or the petition of any person, the commission may, after notice and the opportunity for a hearing in accordance with the Wyoming Administrative Procedure Act, find and conclude that a telecommunications service found to be competitive under subsection (a) of this section is no longer subject to competition, and therefore not subject to treatment as a competitive service under this chapter. All hearings conducted pursuant to this subsection shall place the burden of proof upon the commission or the petitioner of establishing that a telecommunications service is no longer subject to competition.

Telecommunications service provided by new entrants, local exchange services provided by resale, telecommunications services provided by interexchange telecommunications companies, interexchange telecommunications services and telecommunications services other than local exchange service and switched access provided by a local exchange company shall be considered subject to competition for purpose of regulation under this title. Notwithstanding the foregoing, local exchange service may be determined to be competitive pursuant to subsection (a) of this section.

Notwithstanding subsection (a) of this section the commission shall, in an area defined by an applicant, find retail telecommunications services other than switched access are competitive provided:

At least seventy-five percent (75%) of the class of customers in the area have access to at least one (1) landline carrier unaffiliated with the applicant providing local voice service. The local voice service may be provided in combination with other services. If a company does not differentiate between residential and business classes of service in its application, the requirement shall be that at least sixty percent (60%), considering residential and business customers as one (1) class of customers, have access to at least one (1) landline carrier unaffiliated with the applicant;

At least seventy-five percent (75%) of the class of customers in the area have access to at least one (1) wireless provider unaffiliated with the applicant. If a company does not differentiate between residential and business classes of service in its application, the requirement shall be that at least sixty percent (60%), considering residential and business customers as one (1) class of customers, have access to at least one (1) wireless provider unaffiliated with the applicant;

The applicant specifies in the application whether or not the class of customers whose service is to be determined competitive are residential, business or both;

The applicant agrees to provide throughout the area prices which do not vary by geographic location or access to competitors;

The applicant agrees, if residential services are involved and subject to the provisions of subsections (e) and (f) of this section, to continue to provide stand alone basic residential local exchange service at a price less than the price for the stand alone basic residential local exchange service bundled with any other service; and

The applicant agrees for a transition period ending July 1, 2009 to provide stand alone basic residential service at a price that does not exceed the price in effect July 1, 2006 and agrees after July 1, 2009 that it will not increase the price for the stand alone basic residential local exchange service by an amount that exceeds the price in effect July 1, 2008, by more than the cumulative increase in the federal gross domestic product price index since July 1, 2008. For the purpose of this subsection the prices in effect July 1, 2006 and July 1, 2009 shall be modified only to reflect changes in access charges as approved by the commission pursuant to W.S. 37-15-203(f)(ii) and (j) to the extent those changes are not reflected in the rates.

If the price for stand alone basic residential local exchange service is restricted pursuant to subsection (d) of this section, the commission may, upon application and after notice and opportunity for hearing, authorize an increase in the price for the service if the applicant demonstrates that the maximum price allowed pursuant to subsection (d) of this section would not allow the applicant a reasonable opportunity to recover its prudently incurred costs related to the proportion of the property used in providing the essential telecommunications service.

If a company is required to continue to offer stand alone basic residential local exchange service pursuant to subsection (d) of this section, it may apply to the commission for permission to stop offering the service. The commission shall, after notice and opportunity for hearing approve the application if:

A successor agrees to continue the obligation; or

The company establishes to the satisfaction of the commission that the service has become obsolete due to a lack of customers subscribing to the service.

The commission may, on its own motion or upon application by the office of consumer advocate or by any interested party, find retail telecommunications services are not competitive in any area where it has previously found them to be competitive pursuant to subsection (d) of this section if, after notice and opportunity for hearing, it finds that:

Due to merger, acquisition, predatory pricing or marketing practices or withdrawal of offerings, the degree of competition required by subsection (d) of this section no longer exists; or

The local exchange telecommunications provider has not complied with the conditions it agreed to pursuant to subsection (d) of this section.

Nothing in this section affects or modifies:

Any applicable wholesale tariff or any commission authority to implement or enforce any rights, duties or obligations of any party related to wholesale services;

Any entity’s obligations or rights or commission authority under the Federal Communications Act of 1934, 47 U.S.C. 251 and 252;

Any commission jurisdiction over intrastate switched access rates, terms and conditions, including the implementation of federal law with respect to intercarrier compensation;

Any commission jurisdiction or authority pursuant to W.S. 37-15-401(a)(vii), including commission jurisdiction or authority to address federal high cost fund or federal universal service fund issues.

Services found to be competitive under subsection (a), (c) or (d) of this section shall be subject to the following:

Any required assessments under W.S.

37-15-501

and

37-15-502

;

Any required assessment of 911 or E911 emergency service taxes as provided in title 16, chapter 9, article 1 of the Wyoming statutes;

Any required special fee under W.S.

16-9-209

;

Any required assessment levied under W.S.

37-2-106

through

37-2-109

;

Certification as applicable under W.S.

37-15-201

.

History.

Laws 1995, ch. 181, § 1; W.S. 1977, § 37-14-202; 2007, ch. 142, § 1; 2015 ch. 96, § 1, effective July 1, 2015.

The 2007 amendment,

effective July 1, 2007, rewrote section generally.

The 2015 amendment,

effective July 1, 2015, in the introductory language of (a), inserted “or pursuant to the commission's own motion” in the first sentence, and substituted “pursuant to this section shall not be subject to regulation” for “shall not be subject to regulation of prices”; in (a)(i), inserted “satellite providers”; added the last sentence in (c); in (d)(i), substituted “local voice service” for “telecommunications service that includes local voice telecommunications service” in the first sentence, and deleted “telecommunications” following “local voice” in the second sentence; added (h) and (i); and made a related change.

Wyoming Administrative Procedure Act. —

See § 16-3-101(a), (b)(xi).

Non-essential telecommunication service not subject to regulation. —

Optional business service allowing a customer using a number of telephone lines to include the lines in a single-switched system at volume discount rates, which was not necessary for the connection between the end user's premises and the local network switching facility, was not an essential telecommunications service, and thus it was not subject to regulation as a noncompetitive service. U S West Communs. v. Wyoming PSC, 988 P.2d 1061,

1999 Wyo. LEXIS 156

(Wyo. 1999), modified, 15 P.3d 722,

2000 Wyo. LEXIS 228

(Wyo. 2000).

Enhanced digital service. —

With traditional telephone service still available throughout the state, ISDN, an enhanced digital service, was not “necessary” within the meaning of the statute because it was not required for origination or termination of two-way, switched telecommunications; ISDN was therefore a competitive telecommunications service and was not subject to price regulation by public service commission. US West Communs., Inc. v. Wyoming PSC, 989 P.2d 616,

1999 Wyo. LEXIS 160

(Wyo. 1999).

Cited

in

US West Communs. v. Wyoming PSC, 15 P.3d 722,

2000 Wyo. LEXIS 228

(Wyo. 2000).

§ 37-15-203.
Price regulation of noncompetitive essential services.

Prices for telecommunications services which have been determined by the legislature or the commission to be noncompetitive essential telecommunications services shall be regulated by the commission in accordance with this section. The prices for noncompetitive essential telecommunications services of any local exchange company may be adjusted downward at the company’s discretion. Except as provided in subsections (e), (f), (h) and (j) of this section, prices for noncompetitive essential telecommunications services shall be subject to a maximum determined by the commission. The initial maximum shall be the local exchange company’s price of noncompetitive essential telecommunications services as of July 1, 2006. A local exchange carrier may increase its price for noncompetitive essential telecommunications services to the level of the maximum set under this subsection without approval of the commission as required under subsections (f) and (g) of this section.

through (d) Repealed by Laws 2007, ch. 142, § 2.

A local exchange company may seek approval to make revenue neutral adjustments, considering only revenue from noncompetitive essential telecommunications services, to the price of noncompetitive essential telecommunications services to reduce or eliminate differences in the price of noncompetitive essential telecommunications services in different portions of its service area. A local exchange company shall not use adjustments under this section to increase receipt of state universal service funds or increase switched access prices. This subsection shall not apply retroactively.

A local exchange company may seek approval to increase the price of noncompetitive essential telecommunications services, including switched access charges, based on:

Changes in the local calling area as approved by the commission;

Changes in access charges as approved by the commission;

Other changes affecting noncompetitive essential telecommunications services; or

Increases in the cost of providing telecommunications services. The increases shall be judged on the overall federal gross domestic product price index published by the United States department of commerce, bureau of economic analysis unless the applicant demonstrates that specific cost increases are disproportionably affecting the cost of providing their noncompetitive essential services.

Any requested price change under subsections (b) through (f) of this section, including revenue neutral changes, that may result in an increase in the price of noncompetitive essential telecommunications services is subject to review and determination by the commission, after notice and opportunity for hearing.

The prices of any local exchange company may contain provisions for incentives for improvement of the company’s performance or efficiency, lowering of operating costs, control of expenses or improvement and upgrading or modernization of its services or facilities. Any local exchange company may apply to the commission for incentives and innovative or nontraditional price regulation, including price indexing. The commission shall issue a final order approving, modifying or rejecting any application made under this subsection within one hundred eighty (180) days of the filing date of the application with the commission. If no order is issued by the commission within the one hundred eighty (180) day period, the application shall be deemed approved as filed. If during consideration of an application for regulation under this subsection, the commission materially alters the plan as filed in the application, the applying local exchange company may notify the commission in writing, at any time, but not later than sixty (60) days after any final commission order on the application, that it elects not to be price regulated as approved by the order. The local exchange company’s prices shall then be regulated as they were prior to the application until such time as a new application is filed, approved and accepted.

Unless as otherwise directed under federal law, noncompetitive switched access shall not be priced above three cents ($.03) per minute after January 1, 2010.

History.

Laws 1995, ch. 181, § 1; W.S. 1977, § 37-14-203; 2007, ch. 142, §§ 1, 2; 2008, ch. 107, § 1; ch. 116, § 1; 2015 ch. 96, § 1, effective July 1, 2015.

The 2007 amendment,

effective July 1, 2007, in (a) deleted “not” following “telecommunications services which have”, substituted “noncompetitive essential telecommunications services” for “competitive”, inserted last four sentences; repealed (b) through (d); added (e) through (j).

The 2008 amendments.—

The first 2008 amendment, by ch. 107, § 1, effective March 13, 2008, in (e), added “or increase switched access prices” at the end of the second sentence, added the last sentence; added “including switched access charges” in the introductory language of (f).

Laws 2008, ch. 107, § 2, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 13, 2008.

The second 2008 amendment, by ch. 116, § 1, effective March 13, 2008, substituted “United States department of commerce, bureau of economic analysis” for “United States department of labor, bureau of labor statistics” in (f)(iv).

Laws 2008, ch. 116, § 5, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 13, 2008.

While neither
amendment gave effect to the other, both have been given effect in
this section as set out above.

The 2015 amendment,

effective July 1, 2015, in (j), deleted the second sentence through the end.

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (i) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

Wyoming Administrative Procedure Act. —

See § 16-3-101(a), (b)(xi).

Construction. —

While the public service commission may not set a price for services over the objection of the company, it still has authority to regulate noncompetitive telecommunications services provided to local communities. Tri County Tel. Ass'n v. Wyoming Pub. Serv. Comm'n, 11 P.3d 938,

2000 Wyo. LEXIS 201

(Wyo. 2000).

Governing authority. —

Commission's authority to set rates for the implementation of an extended area service in a case initiated before the enactment of the Telecommunications Act is governed by the US West Communs. v. Wyoming PSC, 958 P.2d 376,

1998 Wyo. LEXIS 61

(Wyo. 1998).

The Commission exceeded its power

by setting rates for an extended area service which arose from a citizen initiated complaint; the Telecommunications Act limits the PSC's rate-making powers to the approval, modification, or rejection of an application submitted by a local telephone company for innovative and nontraditional price regulation. US West Communs. v. Wyoming PSC, 958 P.2d 371,

1998 Wyo. LEXIS 60

(Wyo. 1998).

§ 37-15-204.
Price schedules.

A local exchange company shall file with the commission, in such form and detail as the commission may require, schedules showing all noncompetitive telecommunications services terms, conditions and prices currently in effect and charged to customers by the company in this state. All prices for new noncompetitive telecommunications services, and any increase in prices for noncompetitive telecommunications services as authorized by the commission pursuant to W.S.

37-15-203

, shall be filed thirty (30) days prior to the proposed effective date. No price increase for a noncompetitive service shall be effective unless the customer has been given notice by the provider at least one (1) full billing cycle prior to the proposed increase and the increase has been approved by the commission as required by W.S.

37-15-203

. No price or price change is effective until filed in accordance with this section. For purposes of this subsection, the rules, regulations, policies, practices and other requirements relating to services shall be filed with the commission in such form and detail as the commission may require. Rules, regulations, policies, practices and other requirements relating to noncompetitive services shall be subject to the same requirements under this chapter as the prices of noncompetitive services.

and (c) Repealed by Laws 2007, ch. 142, § 2.

Repealed by Laws 2015, ch. 96, § 2.

History.

Laws 1995, ch. 181, § 1; W.S. 1977, § 37-14-204; 2007, ch. 142, §§ 1, 2; 2015 ch. 96, §§
1, 2, effective July 1, 2015.

The 2007 amendment,

effective July 1, 2007, rewrote (a) and repealed former (b) and (c), which read: “(b) A local exchange company may by contract or by price schedule provide telecommunications services which are found to be competitive at prices and under terms and conditions that are specific to a particular customer or group of customers. Copies of contracts and price schedules shall be filed with the commission in the same manner as price schedules. Contract prices shall equal or exceed long-run incremental costs. Contracts and price schedules filed under this section shall be given confidential status if requested by the filing party.

“(c) Notwithstanding any other provision of this section, price and service changes regarding promotional, time-limited, customer-limited and other minor miscellaneous service offerings shall be filed with the commission ten (10) days prior to the proposed effective date.”

The 2015 amendment,

effective July 1, 2015, in (a), deleted the former fifth through seventh sentences; and combined and rewrote the former next-to-last and last sentences; and repealed form (d), pertaining to confidentiality of competitive contract bids.

Quoted

in

Tri County Tel. Ass'n v. Wyoming Pub. Serv. Comm'n, 11 P.3d 938,

2000 Wyo. LEXIS 201

(Wyo. 2000).